test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_CW_jooweshk_gt-norm.yaml
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: jooweshkoonsshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [2, 4, 7]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Obv: jooweshkoonyshan
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: jooweshkoonyshing
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: jooweshkoonyshag
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Obv: jooweshkoonsshan
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: jooweshkoonsshing
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: jooweshkoonsshag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [2, 6, 7]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Obv: jooweshkoonybaniin
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonybaniing
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: jooweshkoonybaniig
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Obv: jooweshkoonsbaniin
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonsbaniing
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: jooweshkoonsbaniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [4, 6, 7]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Obv: jooweshkshibniin
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: jooweshkshibniing
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: jooweshkshibniig
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 4]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 5]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 6]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 3, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 4, 5]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Sg+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonyshinaa, njooweshkoonymishnaa]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Sg+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonsshinaa, njooweshkoonsmishnaa]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Sg+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonyshinaa, gjooweshkoonymishnaa]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Sg+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonyshiwaa, gjooweshkoonymishwaa]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Sg+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonsshinaa, gjooweshkoonsmishnaa]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Sg+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonsshiwaa, gjooweshkoonsmishwaa]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Sg+Px4: [jooweshkoonyshini, jooweshkoonymishni]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Sg+Px4: [jooweshkoonsshini, jooweshkoonsmishni]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 4, 6]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonyshiba, njooweshkoonymishba]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonyshidig, njooweshkoonymishdig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonsshiba, njooweshkoonsmishba]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonsshidig, njooweshkoonsmishdig]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonyshiba, gjooweshkoonymishba]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonyshidig, gjooweshkoonymishdig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonsshiba, gjooweshkoonsmishba]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonsshidig, gjooweshkoonsmishdig]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Sg+PxX: [jooweshkoonyshiba, jooweshkoonymishba]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl+PxX: [jooweshkoonyshidig, jooweshkoonymishdig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Sg+PxX: [jooweshkoonsshiba, jooweshkoonsmishba]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl+PxX: [jooweshkoonsshidig, jooweshkoonsmishdig]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 4, 7]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Obv+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonyshan, njooweshkoonymishan]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Loc+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonyshing, njooweshkoonymishing]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Pl+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonyshag, njooweshkoonymishag]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Obv+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonsshan, njooweshkoonsmishan]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonsshing, njooweshkoonsmishing]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonsshag, njooweshkoonsmishag]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Obv+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonyshan, gjooweshkoonymishan]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Loc+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonyshing, gjooweshkoonymishing]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Pl+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonyshag, gjooweshkoonymishag]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Obv+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonsshan, gjooweshkoonsmishan]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonsshing, gjooweshkoonsmishing]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonsshag, gjooweshkoonsmishag]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Obv+Px3Sg: [jooweshkoonyshan, jooweshkoonymishan]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Loc+Px3Sg: [jooweshkoonyshing, jooweshkoonymishing]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Obv+Px3Sg: [jooweshkoonsshan, jooweshkoonsmishan]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc+Px3Sg: [jooweshkoonsshing, jooweshkoonsmishing]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Obv+PxX: [jooweshkoonyshan, jooweshkoonymishan]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Loc+PxX: [jooweshkoonyshing, jooweshkoonymishing]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Pl+PxX: [jooweshkoonyshag, jooweshkoonymishag]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Obv+PxX: [jooweshkoonsshan, jooweshkoonsmishan]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc+PxX: [jooweshkoonsshing, jooweshkoonsmishing]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl+PxX: [jooweshkoonsshag, jooweshkoonsmishag]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 5, 6]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Sg+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonynaanba, njooweshkoonyminaanba]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Voc+Pl+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonynaandig, njooweshkoonyminaandig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Sg+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonsnaanba, njooweshkoonsminaanba]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonsnaandig, njooweshkoonsminaandig]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Sg+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonynaanba, gjooweshkoonyminaanba]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Voc+Pl+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonynaandig, gjooweshkoonyminaandig]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Sg+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonywaaba, gjooweshkoonymiwaaba]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Voc+Pl+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonywaadig, gjooweshkoonymiwaadig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Sg+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonsnaanba, gjooweshkoonsminaanba]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonsnaandig, gjooweshkoonsminaandig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Sg+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonswaaba, gjooweshkoonsmiwaaba]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonswaadig, gjooweshkoonsmiwaadig]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Sg+Px4: [jooweshkoonyniwba, jooweshkoonyminwiba]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Sg+Px4: [jooweshkoonsniwba, jooweshkoonsminwiba]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 5, 7]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Obv+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonynaanin, njooweshkoonyminaanin]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Loc+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonynaaning, njooweshkoonyminaaning]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pl+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonynaanig, njooweshkoonyminaanig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Obv+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonsnaanin, njooweshkoonsminaanin]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Loc+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonsnaaning, njooweshkoonsminaaning]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pl+Px1Pl: [njooweshkoonsnaanig, njooweshkoonsminaanig]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Obv+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonynaanin, gjooweshkoonyminaanin]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Loc+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonynaaning, gjooweshkoonyminaaning]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pl+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonynaanig, gjooweshkoonyminaanig]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Obv+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonywaan, gjooweshkoonymiwaan]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Loc+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonywaang, gjooweshkoonymiwaang]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pl+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonywaag, gjooweshkoonymiwaag]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Obv+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonsnaanin, gjooweshkoonsminaanin]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Loc+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonsnaaning, gjooweshkoonsminaaning]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pl+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkoonsnaanig, gjooweshkoonsminaanig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Obv+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonswaan, gjooweshkoonsmiwaan]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Loc+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonswaang, gjooweshkoonsmiwaang]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pl+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkoonswaag, gjooweshkoonsmiwaag]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Obv+Px3Pl: [jooweshkoonywaan, jooweshkoonymiwaan]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Loc+Px3Pl: [jooweshkoonywaang, jooweshkoonymiwaang]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Obv+Px4: [jooweshkoonyniwan, jooweshkoonyminwan]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Loc+Px4: [jooweshkoonyniing, jooweshkoonyminiing]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Obv+Px3Pl: [jooweshkoonswaan, jooweshkoonsmiwaan]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Loc+Px3Pl: [jooweshkoonswaang, jooweshkoonsmiwaang]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Obv+Px4: [jooweshkoonsniwan, jooweshkoonsminwan]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Loc+Px4: [jooweshkoonsniing, jooweshkoonsminiing]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 2, 6, 7]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Obv+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonybaniin, njooweshkoonymibniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Loc+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonybaniing, njooweshkoonymibniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Pl+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonybaniig, njooweshkoonymibniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Obv+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonsbaniin, njooweshkoonsmibniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonsbaniing, njooweshkoonsmibniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl+Px1Sg: [njooweshkoonsbaniig, njooweshkoonsmibniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Obv+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonybaniin, gjooweshkoonymibniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Loc+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonybaniing, gjooweshkoonymibniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Pl+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonybaniig, gjooweshkoonymibniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Obv+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonsbaniin, gjooweshkoonsmibniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonsbaniing, gjooweshkoonsmibniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkoonsbaniig, gjooweshkoonsmibniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Obv+Px3Sg: [jooweshkoonybaniin, jooweshkoonymibniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Loc+Px3Sg: [jooweshkoonybaniing, jooweshkoonymibniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Obv+Px3Sg: [jooweshkoonsbaniin, jooweshkoonsmibniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc+Px3Sg: [jooweshkoonsbaniing, jooweshkoonsmibniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Obv+PxX: [jooweshkoonybaniin, jooweshkoonymibniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Loc+PxX: [jooweshkoonybaniing, jooweshkoonymibniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Pl+PxX: [jooweshkoonybaniig, jooweshkoonymibniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Obv+PxX: [jooweshkoonsbaniin, jooweshkoonsmibniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc+PxX: [jooweshkoonsbaniing, jooweshkoonsmibniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl+PxX: [jooweshkoonsbaniig, jooweshkoonsmibniig]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 4, 5]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 4, 6]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 4, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 5, 6]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 5, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 3, 6, 7]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 4, 5, 6]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px1Pl: [njooweshkshinaanba, njooweshkmishnaanba]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px1Pl: [njooweshkshinaandig, njooweshkmishnaandig]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkshinaanba, gjooweshkmishnaanba]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkshinaandig, gjooweshkmishnaandig]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkshiwaaba, gjooweshkmishwaaba]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkshiwaadig, gjooweshkmishwaadig]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Sg+Px4: [jooweshkshinwiba, jooweshkmishniwba]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 4, 5, 7]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Obv+Px1Pl: [njooweshkshinaanin, njooweshkmishnaanin]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Loc+Px1Pl: [njooweshkshinaaning, njooweshkmishnaaning]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Pl+Px1Pl: [njooweshkshinaanig, njooweshkmishnaanig]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Obv+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkshinaanin, gjooweshkmishnaanin]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Loc+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkshinaaning, gjooweshkmishnaaning]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Pl+Px21Pl: [gjooweshkshinaanig, gjooweshkmishnaanig]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Obv+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkshiwaan, gjooweshkmishwaan]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Loc+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkshiwaang, gjooweshkmishwaang]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Pl+Px2Pl: [gjooweshkshiwaag, gjooweshkmishwaag]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Obv+Px3Pl: [jooweshkshiwaan, jooweshkmishwaan]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Loc+Px3Pl: [jooweshkshiwaang, jooweshkmishwaang]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Obv+Px4: [jooweshkshinwan, jooweshkmishniwan]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Loc+Px4: [jooweshkshiniing, jooweshkmishniing]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: [1, 4, 6, 7]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px1Sg: [njooweshkshibniin, njooweshkmishbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px1Sg: [njooweshkshibniing, njooweshkmishbaniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px1Sg: [njooweshkshibniig, njooweshkmishbaniig]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Obv+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkshibniin, gjooweshkmishbaniin]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkshibniing, gjooweshkmishbaniing]
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl+Px2Sg: [gjooweshkshibniig, gjooweshkmishbaniig]
